Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-357
Definitions, sections found.

For purposes of sections 8-356 to 8-384, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 8-358 to 8-370 shall be used.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 2.